Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1838
Civil service; leave of absence.

A leave of absence, with or without pay, may be granted by the appointing authority to any person under civil service. The appointing authority shall give notice of such leave to the commission. All appointments for temporary employment resulting from such leaves of absence shall be made from the eligible list, if any, of the civil service.

Laws 1943, c. 29, § 13, p. 136;

R.S.1943, § 19-1813;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-1813;

Laws 1985, LB 372, § 17.